Oklahoma, session 2026, SB481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 840-2.31 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No public employee, including an employee of a state agency,
a political subdivision, or a school district, whose salary or wages
are paid with taxpayer dollars may speak on or participate in a
matter of public concern deemed a matter of larger societal
significance or importance, either as an individual or as an
organized form of protest, during the employee’s normal work hours;
provided, a public employee is authorized to engage in such conduct
during normal work hours if the employee uses annual leave and the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB481 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

acti ons of the employee will not create an undue burden on the
employer’s interests in an efficient, disruptive-free workplace.
B. In no event shall a public employee use assets or equipment
owned by the state, a political subdivision, or a school district
for any purpose, other than at school events or for express purposes
outlined in the employee’s job description, for conduct pursuant to
subsection A of this section, including, but not limited to:
1. Computer equipment, including equipment that facilitates the
use of email, text messaging, or social media from any state-owned,
-leased, or -funded devices;
2. Transportation equipment, including any vehicles, school
buses, trailers, or other modes of transportation; or
3. Any other materials, including food, sound equipment, or
material utilizing the employer emblem, insignia, or symbol.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS



SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB481 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)